North Carolina, session 2025, SB818.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Section 3 of the Charter of the Town of Pink Hill, being Chapter 31 of
the Private Laws of 1915, as amended by Chapter 221 of the Private Laws of 1933, Chapter 760
of the 1955 Session Laws, Town Resolution adopted on June 9, 2020, and Town Resolution
adopted on February 10, 2026, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 3. In elections for the Mayor and Board of Commissioners of the Town of Pink Hill in
2021 and biennially thereafter, voting shall be voters casting ballots in person, on the day of the
municipal election, at the local precinct, pursuant to the provisions of North Carolina General
Statutes Chapter 163.Conduct of Elections. – Regular municipal elections for officers in the
Town of Pink Hill shall be held at the time of the general election in each even-numbered year.
The election shall be conducted on a nonpartisan plurality basis and the result determined in
accordance with G.S. 163-292. Except as otherwise provided, the election shall be conducted in
accordance with the uniform municipal election laws in Chapter 163 of the General Statutes."
SECTION 2. Section 3.1 of the Charter of the Town of Pink Hill, being Chapter 31
of the Private Laws of 1915, as amended by Chapter 221 of the Private Laws of 1933 and S.L.
2011-46, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 3.1. In 2011 and quadrennially thereafter, the Mayor shall be elected for a four-year
term. In 2011, three commissioners shall be elected, with the top vote getter receiving a four-year
term and the two persons receiving the next highest numbers of votes receiving two-year terms.
In 2013 and quadrennially thereafter, two commissioners shall be elected for four-year terms. In
2015 and quadrennially thereafter, one commissioner shall be elected for a four-year
term.Composition and Terms of Office for Mayor and Commissioners. – The governing body of
the Town of Pink Hill shall consist of a mayor and three commissioners. The mayor shall be
elected for a term of four years. The terms of office of commissioners shall be four-year staggered
terms."
SECTION 3. No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of Pink Hill in
2027. The terms of office for the mayor and one commissioner in the Town of Pink Hill serving
on the effective date of this act whose terms are set to expire in 2027 shall be extended by one
year. The terms of office for the two commissioners in the Town of Pink Hill serving on the
effective date of this act whose terms are set to expire in 2029 shall be extended by one year.
Regular municipal elections in the Town of Pink Hill shall resume in even-numbered years
*S818-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
beginning in 2028 with the same staggering of terms as when elections were conducted in the
odd-numbered years.
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to elections held
on or after that date.
Page 2 Senate Bill 818-First Edition